Utah statutes.
36-3-1.   Enrolling by Legislature.

All bills ordered enrolled by the Legislature shall be delivered to the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel, who shall without delay enroll the bills and return them to the secretary of the Senate or chief clerk of the House of Representatives.

